Maryland, session 2025, HB0618.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Agency” means the State Lottery and Gaming Control Agency.
(c) “Commission” means the State Lottery and Gaming Control Commission.
(d) “Director” means the Director of the Agency.
(e) “Governmental unit” means:
(1) an instrumentality of the State;
(2) a county or municipal corporation of the State; or
(3) an instrumentality of a county or municipal corporation of the State.
(f) “JACKPOT GAME” MEANS A LOTTERY GAME FOR WHICH THE TOP PRIZE
AMOUNT VARIES:
– 1 –

Ch. 340 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) BASED ON SALES; AND
(2) IF THE PRIZE WAS WON IN THE PRECEDING DRAWING.
(G) “License” means a license issued by the Director to act as a licensed agent.
[(g)] (H) “Licensed agent” means a person or governmental unit licensed by the
Director to act as a State lottery sales agent.
(I) “MULTIJURISDICTIONAL GAME” MEANS A LOTTERY GAME OFFERED BY
THE AGENCY AND:
(1) ANY OTHER POLITICAL ENTITY OUTSIDE THE STATE OR OUTSIDE
THE UNITED STATES; OR
(2) ANY PRIVATE LICENSEE OF A STATE OR FOREIGN NATION.
[(h)] (J) (1) “State lottery” means the lottery established and operated under
this subtitle.
(2) “State lottery” includes a raffle conducted by the Agency.
(K) “SUBSCRIPTION” MEANS A METHOD OF PLAYING A
MULTIJURISDICTIONAL OR JACKPOT LOTTERY GAME BY WHICH AN INDIVIDUAL
SUBMITS TO THE AGENCY:
(1) AN APPLICATION TO PLAY A GAME USING THE SAME GAME DATA
FOR A SPECIFIED NUMBER OF CONSECUTIVE DRAWINGS; AND
(2) PAYMENT FOR THE DRAWINGS.
9–111.
(e) (1) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) PARAGRAPHS (2)
AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE Agency may not allow the establishment of any
system or program that allows a person to purchase a State lottery ticket through an
electronic device that connects to the Internet, such as a personal computer or mobile
device.
(2) THE AGENCY MAY ALLOW THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A SYSTEM OR
PROGRAM THAT ALLOWS FOR THE PURCHASE OF A STATE LOTTERY SUBSCRIPTION
PLAN AN INDIVIDUAL TO PURCHASE A SUBSCRIPTION THROUGH AN ELECTRONIC
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 340
DEVICE THAT CONNECTS TO THE INTERNET, SUCH AS A PERSONAL COMPUTER OR
MOBILE DEVICE.
(3) (I) THE AGENCY MAY ALLOW A LICENSED AGENT TO SELL A
VOUCHER THAT AN INDIVIDUAL MAY USE TO FUND THE PURCHASE OF A
SUBSCRIPTION.
(II) THE AGENCY SHALL PAY A LICENSED AGENT THAT SELLS A
VOUCHER DESCRIBED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH THE
COMMISSION RATE STATED IN § 9–117 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(III) THE AGENCY SHALL PAY A LICENSED AGENT THE
COMMISSION RATE STATED IN § 9–117 OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR THE RENEWAL OF A
SUBSCRIPTION THAT WAS ORIGINALLY FUNDED BY A VOUCHER SOLD BY THE
LICENSED AGENT AND IS RENEWED BEFORE THE SUBSCRIPTION’S EXPIRATION FOR
A PERIOD OF 24 MONTHS FROM THE DATE OF THE FIRST RENEWAL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2026, the State Lottery and Gaming Control Agency shall report to the Senate Budget and
Taxation Committee, the House Appropriations Committee, and the House Ways and
Means Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on State
lottery subscription sales, including:
(1) the number and amount of subscriptions sold directly by the Agency;
(2) the number and amount of vouchers sold by licensed agents; and
(3) the number of subscription renewals processed directly by the Agency
that were originally funded by vouchers.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 3 –